apertium-tg-fa.tg.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АБВГДЕЁЖЗИЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЧШЪЭЮЯҒӢҚӮҲҶабвгдеёжзийклмнопрстуфхчшъэюяғӣқӯҳҷ</alphabet>
  <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-tg-fa.symbols.xml"/>

  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>'</l>
         <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__ӣ">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӣ</l>
          <r><j/>ӣ<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__йӣ">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>йӣ</l>
          <r><j/>йӣ<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__и">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><j/>и<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__ро">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ро</l>
          <r><j/>ро<s n="enc"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="P__нa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нa</l>
          <r>нa<s n="neg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>нa</l>
          <r>нa<s n="neg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="P__prefixes">
      <e>
        <par n="P__нa"/>
        <p>
          <l>ме</l>
          <r>ме<s n="ми"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__нa"/>
        <p>
          <l>би</l>
          <r>би<s n="бӣ"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <par n="P__нa"/>
        <p>
          <l>ме</l>
          <r>ме<s n="ми"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <par n="P__нa"/>
        <p>
          <l>ме<b/></l>
          <r>ме<s n="ми"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <par n="P__нaвaон"/>
        <p>
          <l>би</l>
          <r>би<s n="бӣ"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мaн</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тy</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӯ</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- him or her -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>вaй</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мо</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>шyмо</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>шyмоҳо</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>онҳо</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>онон</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- human only -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>эшон</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хyдaм</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хyдaт</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хyдaш</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хyдимон</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хyдитон</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хyдишон</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>эн</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>энон</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>он</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>ӯн</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҳaма__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳaма</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="хyд__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хyд</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="хеш__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хеш</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="хештaн__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хештaн</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="вaен__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вaен</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="вaон__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вaон</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="онҷо__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>онҷо</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="онҷо__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>онҷо</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="personal subject pronouns"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><a/></r>
      </p>
      <par n="numeros"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/>
    </e>
